Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.264

[Art. 28] Detail or employment of reporters and interpreters.

Under such regulations as the governor may prescribe, the convening authority of a general or special court martial or court of inquiry shall detail or employ qualified court reporters, who shall record the proceedings of and testimony taken before that court. Under like regulations the convening authority of a military court may detail or employ interpreters who shall interpret for the court.

[ 1963 c 220 s 30.]